test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-siema_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - siemâ: # eres - ok
    siemâ+N+Sg+Nom: siemâ
    siemâ+N+Sg+Gen: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Acc: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Ill: sieˊṃânân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Loc: sieˊṃânist
    siemâ+N+Sg+Com: sieˊṃânáin
    siemâ+N+Sg+Abe: siemmânttáá
    siemâ+N+Ess: [siemân, sieˊṃânin]
    siemâ+N+Par: [siemâd, sieˊṃânid]
    siemâ+N+Pl+Nom: sieˊṃâneh
    siemâ+N+Pl+Gen: sieˊṃânij
    siemâ+N+Pl+Acc: sieˊṃânijd
    siemâ+N+Pl+Ill: sieˊṃânáid
    siemâ+N+Pl+Loc: sieˊṃânijn
    siemâ+N+Pl+Com: sieˊṃânijguin
    siemâ+N+Pl+Abe: sieˊṃânijttáá
